pt-PT: Tamanho de corrente compatível: Passo de 1/2 polegada; 1/8 polegada (3,175 mm); 3/32 polegada (2,381 mm); Universal; Outro
nl: Compatibele kettingmaat: 1/2 inch pitch; 1/8 inch (3,175 mm); 3/32 inch (2,381 mm); Universeel; Overig
pl: Zgodny rozmiar łańcucha: Skok 1/2 cala; 1/8 cala (3,175 mm); 3/32 cala (2,381 mm); Uniwersalny; Inne
nb: Kompatibel kjedestørrelse: 1/2-tommers stigning; 1/8 tomme (3,175 mm); 3/32 tomme (2,381 mm); Universell; Annet
pt-BR: Tamanho de corrente compatível: Passo de 1/2 pol; 1/8 pol (3,175 mm); 3/32 pol (2,381 mm); Universal; Outro
ko: 호환 체인 크기: 1/2인치 피치; 1/8인치(3.175mm); 3/32인치(2.381mm); 범용; 기타
bg-BG: Съвместим размер на веригата: Стъпка 1/2 инча; 1/8 инча (3,175 mm); 3/32 инча (2,381 mm); Универсален; Друго
zh-TW: 相容鏈條尺寸: 1/2 吋節距; 1/8 吋 (3.175 毫米); 3/32 吋 (2.381 毫米); 通用; 其他
fr: Format de canette compatible: Pas de 1/2 po; 1/8 po (3,175 mm); 3/32 po (2,381 mm); Universel; Autre
ja: 対応チェーンサイズ: 1/2インチピッチ; 1/8インチ (3.175 mm); 3/32インチ (2.381 mm); 汎用; その他
zh-CN: 适用链条尺寸: 1/2 英寸节距; 1/8 英寸（3.175 毫米）; 3/32 英寸（2.381 毫米）; 通用; 其他
hu: Kompatibilis láncméret: 1/2 hüvelykes osztás; 1/8 hüvelyk (3,175 mm); 3/32 hüvelyk (2,381 mm); Univerzális; Egyéb
hr-HR: Kompatibilna veličina lanca: Korak od 1/2 inča; 1/8 inča (3,175 mm); 3/32 inča (2,381 mm); Univerzalno; Ostalo
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta verige: Korak 1/2 in; 1/8 in (3,175 mm); 3/32 in (2,381 mm); Univerzalno; Drugo
ro-RO: Dimensiune lanț compatibil: Pas de 1/2 inch; 1/8 inch (3,175 mm); 3/32 inch (2,381 mm); Universal; Altele
lt-LT: Suderinamo dydžio grandinė: 1/2 col. žingsnis; 1/8 col. (3,175 mm); 3/32 col. (2,381 mm); Universali; Kita
es: Tamaño de cadena compatible: Paso de 1/2 pulgada; 1/8 de pulgada (3,175 mm); 3/32 de pulgada (2,381 mm); Universal; Otro
cs: Kompatibilní velikost řetězu: Rozteč 1/2 palce; 1/8 palce (3,175 mm); 3/32 palce (2,381 mm); Univerzální; Jiné
da: Kompatibel kædestørrelse: 1/2 tomme pitch; 1/8 tomme (3,175 mm); 3/32 tomme (2,381 mm); Universal; Andet
tr: Uyumlu zincir boyutu: 1/2 inç adım; 1/8 inç (3,175 mm); 3/32 inç (2,381 mm); Evrensel; Diğer
it: Taglia della catena compatibile: Passo da 1/2 in; 1/8 in (3,175 mm); 3/32 in (2,381 mm); Universale; Altro
en: Compatible chain size: 1/2 inch pitch; 1/8 inch (3.175 mm); 3/32 inch (2.381 mm); Universal; Other
de: Kompatible Kettengröße: 1/2 Zoll Teilung; 1/8 Zoll (3,175 mm); 3/32 Zoll (2,381 mm); Universal; Sonstige
ru: Совместимый размер цепи: Шаг 1/2 дюйма; 1/8 дюйма (3,175 мм); 3/32 дюйма (2,381 мм); Универсальный; Другое
th: ขนาดโซ่ที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: พิตช์ 1/2 นิ้ว; 1/8 นิ้ว (3.175 มม.); 3/32 นิ้ว (2.381 มม.); อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
fi: Yhteensopiva ketjukoko: 1/2 tuuman jako; 1/8 tuumaa (3,175 mm); 3/32 tuumaa (2,381 mm); Universaali; Muu
el: Συμβατό μέγεθος δοχείου (κουτιού): Βήμα 1/2 ίντσας; 1/8 ίντσας (3,175 mm); 3/32 ίντσας (2,381 mm); Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
sv: Kompatibel kedjestorlek: 1/2-tums delning; 1/8 tum (3,175 mm); 3/32 tum (2,381 mm); Universell; Annat
sk-SK: Kompatibilná veľkosť reťaze: Rozstup 1/2 palca; 1/8 palca (3,175 mm); 3/32 palca (2,381 mm); Univerzálne; Iné
vi: Kích thước xích tương thích: Bước xích 1/2 inch; 1/8 inch (3,175 mm); 3/32 inch (2,381 mm); Đa năng; Khác